Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 443.441 is amended to read:
443.441. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Consistently” means regularly and typically.
(b) “Direct care staff” means staff who provide services for residents  that include assistance
with daily living, medication administration, resident-focused activities, supervision and support.
(c) “Facility” includes a:
(A) Residential care facility as defined in ORS 443.400; and
(B) Facility with a memory care endorsement under ORS 443.886.
(d) “License condition” has the meaning given that term in ORS 441.736.
(e) “Substantial compliance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.436.
(2) In determining whether a facility has qualified awake direct care staff in sufficient numbers
to meet the scheduled and  unscheduled needs of each resident 24 hours a day as prescribed by rule,
the Department of Human Services shall conduct an assessment, in accordance with rules  for home
and community-based settings adopted  by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, and
consider whether the facility consistently:
(a) Implements and maintains a current person-centered service plan for each  resident as re-
quired by rule by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services;
(b) Provides timely access, 24 hours a day, to all  supports needed for activities of daily living
including eating, hydration, toileting, hygiene, bathing, dressing, oral care and  other supports in-
cluded in the resident’s person-centered service plan;
(c) Provides a timely response to issues impacting the dignity of the resident, including but not
limited to wet or soiled briefs, clothing or linens; and
(d) Delivers care  according to the schedule and procedures outlined in the resident’s person-
centered service plan, including but not limited to wound  care, medication administration, pain
control, behavior support, cueing and repositioning.
(3) For a complaint of a licensing violation, other than abuse, that alleges harm or  potential
harm to a resident or for a complaint that a facility  does not have qualified awake direct care staff
in sufficient numbers to meet the scheduled  and unscheduled needs of each resident 24 hours a day:
(a) The department shall begin [ an investigation without undue delay ]:
Enrolled Senate Bill 739 (SB 739-B) Page 1
(A) An  on-site complaint investigation within 24 hours or before the end of the next
business day for a complaint that alleges a licensing violation resulting in death; and
(B) A complaint investigation without undue delay for all other complaints ; and
(b) The investigator shall:
(A) If the complaint involves an allegation  of insufficient staff or if the investigator de-
termines that insufficient staff may have contributed  to the alleged licensing violation,  assess
whether the facility has qualified awake direct care staff in sufficient numbers to  consistently meet
the scheduled and unscheduled  needs of each resident 24 hours a day pursuant to the criteria pre-
scribed by rule under subsection (2) of this section[ ; and ].
(B) Interview all available witnesses who have been identified by any source  as having
personal knowledge relevant to the complaint, including applicable staff or volunteers of  the
Long Term  Care Ombudsman. All interviews shall be conducted privately, unless the witness
requests that the interview not be conducted privately.
[(B)] (C) Write an investigation report that includes:
(i) The investigator’s personal observations;
(ii) A review of documents and records;
(iii) A summary of all witness statements; and
(iv) A statement of the factual basis for  the findings for each incident or problem alleged in the
complaint, including the investigator’s assessment of staffing levels and  whether the facility has
qualified awake  direct care staff in sufficient numbers to consistently meet the scheduled and un-
scheduled needs of each resident 24 hours a day.
(4) A complaint investigation under subsection (3) of this section is separate from, and
not a replacement for,  an adult protective services investigation. The department may initi-
ate a complaint investigation  before or at the same time as an adult protective services in-
vestigation.
(5) No later than 90 days after a complaint investigation  under subsection (3) of this
section is initiated, the department shall provide the department’s findings to the  facility,
the complainant and the Long Term Care Ombudsman.
(6) If a complaint investigation under  subsection (3) of this section results in a substan-
tiated finding of a violation, the department shall:
(a) Immediately notify the facility and the Long Term Care Ombudsman in writing of  the
department’s findings and any license condition or other sanction imposed by the department
as a result of the violation; and
(b) Provide the facility and the Long Term Care Ombudsman with a summary report of
the department’s findings.  The summary may not include any identifiable information about
the resident, except that the report may not be redacted in a way that fails  to disclose that
death or injury occurred. The summary report must, at a minimum:
(A) Be written in clear, concise language that  is readily comprehensible by the average
person; and
(B) Include the nature of the  complaint, the type of violation found by the investigator
in the course of the investigation, the nature of the harm experienced by any resident  as a
result of the violation, whether the violation led to death or  physical injury of a resident or
staff member and any license condition or other sanction imposed on the facility as  a result
of the violation.
(7) Within 72 hours of receiving a summary report described in subsection (6) of this
section, the facility shall provide notice of the substantiated finding of a violation and shall
make the  summary report available to all residents and to any contact persons designated
by residents under ORS 443.444 if:
(a) The department made a substantiated finding  of a violation that is pervasive or that
represents a systemic failure at the facility; and
(b) The department:
Enrolled Senate Bill 739 (SB 739-B) Page 2
(A) Found that the violation caused the death of a resident or  serious harm or serious
physical injury to a resident; or
(B) Imposed a licensing condition on the facility that includes a restriction  on admis-
sions.
(8) If, as a result of a complaint investigation  under subsection (3) of this section, the
department imposes a  licensing condition on a facility that includes a restriction on admis-
sions:
(a) The facility may submit to the department a written assertion  of substantial compli-
ance once the facility has remediated the violation.
(b) Within five calendar days after receipt of the facility’s written assertion of  substan-
tial compliance, the department  shall determine whether the facility has achieved substantial
compliance.
(c) The department shall lift  the restriction within 24 hours if the department determines
that the facility has achieved substantial compliance.
(d) The facility may notify residents once the restriction on admissions has been lifted.
SECTION 2.
Section 3 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS 443.400 to
443.455.
SECTION 3. (1) The Department of Human Services may not grant a residential care
facility’s request  for an exception to the requirements of ORS 443.400 to 443.455 or any other
statutory licensing requirements, unless expressly authorized by statute to grant  an excep-
tion or  to temporarily modify a licensing requirement due to a declaration of a state of
emergency.
(2) If the  department, under authority granted by statute or established by rule, approves
a request for an exception to a licensing requirement,  other than a requirement described
in subsection (1) of this section, the department shall notify the  Long Term Care Ombuds-
man of the exception request and the  department’s intent to approve the request no fewer
than seven days before the exception takes effect.
NOTE: Section 4 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 5.  ORS 443.444 is amended to read:
443.444. Upon the admission of a resident to a residential care facility[ ,]:
(1) The facility shall provide the resident with information developed by the Long Term  Care
Ombudsman describing the availability and services of the ombudsman.
(2) Unless the resident, the resident’s guardian  or the resident’s legal representative
chooses not to identify a designated contact person, the facility shall obtain  from the resi-
dent, the resident’s guardian or the resident’s legal representative  the full name, preferred
contact information and preferred language of an individual to be contacted when the  facil-
ity:
(a) Is required under ORS 443.441 (7) to provide notice of a substantiated finding of a  vi-
olation;
(b) Is required under ORS 443.875 to provide notice of a substantiated finding  of abuse;
or
(c) Is required under ORS 443.436 to provide notice that the facility has been  placed in
the enhanced oversight and supervision program.
(3) The facility shall immediately update the information provided  under subsection (2)
of this section upon written notification from the resident, the resident’s  guardian or the
resident’s legal representative.
SECTION 6.  ORS 443.875 is amended to read:
443.875. (1) If the Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health  Authority substantiates
an allegation of abuse that occurred  in a facility, the department or authority shall immediately
notify the facility of its findings.
(2) Upon receipt of the notice described in subsection (1) of  this section, a facility shall provide
written notice of the findings to the individual found to have committed abuse, the residents  of the
Enrolled Senate Bill 739 (SB 739-B) Page 3
facility, the residents’ case managers [ and], the  residents’ guardians  and any contact persons
designated by residents under ORS 443.444 .
(3) An application for employment at a facility must  inquire whether the applicant has been
found to have committed abuse.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Abuse” has the meaning given that term in ORS 430.735.
(b) “Facility” means:
(A) A residential facility as defined in ORS 443.400; or
(B) An adult foster home as defined in ORS 443.705.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 443.415 is amended to read:
443.415. (1) Applications for licensure to maintain and operate a residential  facility shall be
made to the Department of Human Services or the  Oregon Health Authority on forms provided for
that purpose by the  appropriate licensing agency  and shall include the facility’s proposed policies
and procedures regarding staff and administrator training, service planning,  medication ad-
ministration, food preparation and distribution, safety, emergency response and facility  clo-
sure.
(2) Each application  shall be accompanied by a fee. No fee is required of any governmentally
operated residential facility. The application fee for:
[(2)](a) [ The application fee for ] A residential treatment facility is $60.
(b) [ The application fee  for ] A residential training home or residential training facility shall be
prescribed by the department pursuant to ORS 427.021.
(c) [ The application fee for ] A residential treatment home is $30.
(d) [ The application fee for ] A residential care facility is:
(A) For a facility with one to 15 beds, $2,000.
(B) For a facility with 16 to 49 beds, $3,000.
(C) For a facility with 50 to 99 beds, $4,000.
(D) For a facility with 100 to 150 beds, $5,000.
(E) For a facility with more than 150 beds, $6,000.
(3) Upon receipt of an application and fee, the  licensing agency shall conduct an in-person site
inspection, including, for residential care facilities, an inspection of the kitchen and  other areas
where food is prepared for residents. [ The licensing agency  shall issue a license to any applicant for
operation of a residential facility in compliance with ORS 443.002 and 443.400 to 443.455  and the rules
of the licensing agency. Licensure may be denied  when a residential facility is not in compliance with
ORS 443.002 or 443.400 to 443.455 or the rules of the licensing agency. ]
(4) The licensing agency shall issue an initial license to a residential facility only if:
(a) The facility is in compliance with  ORS 443.002 and 443.400 to 443.455 and the rules of
the licensing agency;
(b) The licensing agency  has completed an inspection of the facility under this section;
and
(c) The licensing agency has reviewed  and approved the facility’s proposed policies and
procedures submitted under subsection (1) of this section.
(5) Licensure shall be denied if the State Fire Marshal,  deputy or approved authority has given
notice of noncompliance of a  residential care facility, residential training facility or residential
treatment facility pursuant to ORS 479.220.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 443.416 is amended to read:
443.416. (1)(a) The  Director of Human Services or authorized representative shall [ periodically]
visit and  inspect every residential care facility, residential training facility or residential training
home to determine whether it is maintained  and operated in accordance with ORS 443.002 and
443.400 to 443.455  and the rules of the director, and to consult with and advise management con-
cerning  methods  of care, treatment, training, records, housing and equipment. Employees of the
Department of Human Services and the State Fire Marshal or authorized representative on request
Enrolled Senate Bill 739 (SB 739-B) Page 4
shall be permitted access to the premises  and records of individuals in the facility or home that are
pertinent to fire safety.
(b) An inspection under this subsection shall be conducted at a minimum:
(A) No less than  90 days and no more than 120 days after an initial license is issued under
ORS 443.415;
(B) No less than 90 days and no more than 120 days after a change in ownership of  a
residential care facility, residential training facility or residential training home; and
(C) Upon receipt of a license renewal application and fee under ORS 443.425.
(c) Inspections under this subsection may be conducted at other times as determined  by
the licensing agency.
(2)(a) The Director of the Oregon Health Authority  or authorized representative shall [ period-
ically] visit  and inspect every residential treatment facility or residential treatment home to deter-
mine whether it is maintained and operated in accordance with  ORS 443.002 and 443.400 to 443.455
and the rules of the director, and to  consult with and advise management concerning methods of
care, treatment, training, records, housing and equipment. Employees of the Oregon Health Au-
thority and the State  Fire Marshal or authorized representative on request shall be permitted access
to the premises and records of individuals in the facility or home that are pertinent to fire safety.
(b) An inspection under this subsection shall be conducted at a minimum:
(A) No less than  90 days and no more than 120 days after an initial license is issued under
ORS 443.415;
(B) No less than 90 days and no more than 120 days after a change in ownership of  a
residential treatment facility or residential treatment home; and
(C) Upon receipt of a license renewal application and fee under ORS 443.425.
(c) Inspections under this subsection may be conducted at other times as determined  by
the licensing agency.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 443.425 is amended to read:
443.425. (1) Licensure under  ORS 443.415 is effective for two years from the date of issue unless
sooner revoked. Each license shall state:
(a) The name of the person operating the residential facility;
(b) The  name of the person who owns the residential facility and, for a residential training fa-
cility or a residential training  home, all persons with an ownership interest of five percent or more;
(c) The address of the premises to which the license applies and the maximum number  of resi-
dents to be maintained in the residential facility at any time  whether the residential facility is li-
censed as a residential training facility, a residential treatment  facility, a residential care facility,
a residential training home or residential treatment home; and
(d) Other information that the Department of Human Services or the Oregon  Health Authority
considers necessary.
(2) A license is renewable upon submission  of an application to the department or the authority
[and], payment of a renewal fee  and completion of an inspection under ORS 443.416 . No fee is
required of a  governmentally operated residential facility. Filing of an application for renewal before
the date of expiration of a license extends the effective date of  expiration of the license until the
licensing agency has acted upon the application. The  licensing agency shall refuse to renew a li-
cense if:
(a) The facility is not substantially in compliance with all applicable laws and rules;
(b) For a residential care facility, the facility has failed an inspection of the kitchen  or other
areas where food  is prepared for residents that was conducted by the department in accordance with
ORS 443.417, except as provided in ORS 443.417 (2); or
(c) The State Fire Marshal, deputy or approved authority has given notice  of noncompliance of
a residential care facility, residential training facility or residential treatment  facility pursuant to
ORS 479.220.
(3)[(a)] The biennial renewal fee for :
(a) A residential training facility or a residential treatment facility is $60.
Enrolled Senate Bill 739 (SB 739-B) Page 5
(b) [ The biennial renewal fee for ] A residential training home is $50.
(c) [ The biennial renewal fee for ] A residential treatment home is $30.
(d) [ The biennial renewal fee for ] A residential care facility is:
(A) For a facility with one to 15 beds, $1,000.
(B) For a facility with 16 to 49 beds, $1,500.
(C) For a facility with 50 to 99 beds, $2,000.
(D) For a facility with 100 to 150 beds, $2,500.
(E) For a facility with more than 150 beds, $3,000.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 443.735 is amended to read:
443.735. (1) As used in this section, “substantial compliance”  means a level of compliance
with state  law and with rules of the licensing agency such that any identified deficiencies
pose a risk of no more than negligible harm to the health or safety of residents.
[(1)(a)] (2)(a) Applications for a license to maintain and  operate an adult foster home shall be
made on forms provided by the licensing agency  and shall include the home’s proposed  policies
and procedures regarding staff and administrator training, service planning,  medication ad-
ministration, food preparation and distribution, safety, emergency response, succession
planning and facility closure.
(b) Each application submitted to the Department of Human Services  for an adult foster home
serving individuals with intellectual or developmental  disabilities shall be accompanied by a fee
prescribed by the department under ORS 427.021.
(c) Each application submitted to the department for an adult foster home serving  older
adults or individuals with physical disabilities shall be accompanied by a fee prescribed by the
department by rule.
[(c)] (d) Each application submitted to the Oregon Health Authority[ , or to  the Department of
Human Services for an adult foster home not serving individuals with intellectual or  developmental
disabilities,] shall be accompanied by a fee of $20 per bed requested for licensing.
[(2)] (3) Upon receipt of an application and fee, the licensing agency  shall conduct an investi-
gation, including an in-person site inspection .
[(3)] (4) The licensing agency shall [ not] issue an initial license [ unless] only if :
(a) The  applicant and adult foster home are in compliance with ORS 443.002 and 443.705 to
443.825 and the rules of the licensing agency;
(b) The licensing  agency has completed an inspection under this section  of the adult foster
home;
(c) The licensing agency has reviewed and  approved the adult foster home’s proposed
policies and procedures submitted under subsection (2) of this section;
[(c)] (d) The licensing agency has completed a criminal  records check under ORS 181A.195 on
the applicant and any person, other than a resident, 16 years of age or older who will be  residing
in the adult foster home. The criminal records check shall be  conducted in accordance with rules
adopted under ORS 181A.195;
[(d)] (e) The licensing agency has determined that the registry maintained under ORS 441.678
contains no finding that  the applicant or any nursing assistant employed by the applicant has been
responsible for abuse; and
[(e)] (f) The  applicant has demonstrated to the licensing agency the financial ability and re-
sources necessary to operate the adult foster home. The licensing agency  shall adopt rules as the
agency deems appropriate that establish the financial standards  an applicant must meet to qualify
for issuance of  a license and that protect financial information from public disclosure. The demon-
stration of financial ability under  this paragraph shall include, but need not be limited to, providing
the licensing agency with a list of any unsatisfied judgments,  pending litigation and unpaid taxes
and notifying the  agency regarding whether the applicant is in bankruptcy. If the applicant is unable
to demonstrate the financial ability and  resources required by this paragraph, the licensing agency
may require the applicant to furnish a financial guarantee as a condition of initial licensure.
Enrolled Senate Bill 739 (SB 739-B) Page 6
[(4)] (5) The  licensing agency [ may not ] shall renew a license under this section [ unless] only
if:
(a) The  applicant and the adult foster home are in  substantial  compliance with ORS 443.002,
443.012 and 443.705 to 443.825 and the rules of the licensing agency;
(b) The  licensing agency has completed an inspection under ORS 443.755  of the adult foster
home;
(c) The licensing agency has completed a criminal records  check under ORS 181A.195 on the
applicant and any person, other than a resident, 16 years of age or older who will be  residing in the
adult foster home. The criminal records check  under this paragraph shall be conducted in accord-
ance with rules adopted under ORS 181A.195; and
(d) The licensing agency  has determined that the registry maintained under ORS 441.678 con-
tains no finding that the applicant or any nursing assistant employed by the applicant  has been re-
sponsible for abuse.
[(5)(a)] (6)(a) In seeking an  initial license and renewal of a license when an adult foster home
has been licensed for less than 24 months, the burden of proof shall be upon  the provider and the
adult foster home to establish compliance with ORS 443.705 to 443.825 and the rules of  the licensing
agency.
(b) In proceedings for renewal of a license when an adult foster home  has been licensed for at
least 24 continuous months, the burden of proof shall be upon the licensing agency to establish
noncompliance with ORS 443.705 to 443.825 and the rules of the agency.
[(6)(a)] (7)(a) Persons who have  been convicted of one or more crimes that, as determined by
rules of the licensing agency, are substantially  related to the qualifications, functions or duties of
a provider, substitute caregiver or other household member of  an adult foster home shall be pro-
hibited from operating, working in or residing in an adult foster home.
(b) The licensing agency shall adopt rules that distinguish  the criminal convictions and types
of abuse that permanently prohibit  a person from operating, working in or living in an adult foster
home from the convictions and types of abuse that do  not permanently prohibit the person from
operating, working in or living in an adult foster home.
(c) A provider may not hire, retain in  employment or allow to live in an adult foster home, other
than as a  resident, any person who the provider knows has been convicted of a disqualifying crime
or has been found responsible for a disqualifying type of abuse.
[(7)] (8) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section,  a license under ORS 443.725 is
effective for one year from the date of issue or renewal unless sooner revoked.
(9)(a) For adult foster homes licensed by the Department of Human  Services, the de-
partment may extend the duration of a license to  two years if the department determines
that the home has been in substantial compliance  with ORS 443.002 and 443.705 to 443.825 and
the rules of the licensing agency for three consecutive years.
(b) If  the duration of an adult foster home’s license has been extended to two years under
this subsection, the home shall remain on a two-year renewal cycle, unless  the department
determines that the home is no longer in substantial compliance,  at which time the depart-
ment may return the home to a one-year renewal cycle.
(10) Each license  shall state the name of the resident manager of the adult foster home, the
names of all providers who own the adult  foster home, the address of the premises to which the li-
cense applies, the  maximum number of residents and the classification of the adult foster home. If,
during the period covered by the license, a resident manager  changes, the provider must within 15
days request modification of the license. The request must be accompanied by a fee of $10.
[(8)] (11) No license  under ORS 443.725 is transferable or applicable to any location, persons
operating the adult  foster home or the person owning the adult foster home other than that indi-
cated on the application for licensing.
[(9)] (12) The licensing agency shall not issue a license to operate an additional  adult foster
home to a provider unless the provider has demonstrated the qualifications and  capacity to operate
the provider’s existing licensed adult foster homes and has demonstrated the ability to provide to
Enrolled Senate Bill 739 (SB 739-B) Page 7
the residents of those adult foster  homes care that is adequate and substantially free from abuse and
neglect.
[(10)(a)] (13)(a) All moneys collected under ORS 443.725  to 443.780 from adult foster homes that
are licensed to serve persons with  mental, emotional or behavioral disturbances or alcohol or drug
dependence shall be deposited in a special account in  the General Fund, and are appropriated con-
tinuously for payment of expenses incurred by the Oregon Health Authority.
(b) All  moneys collected under ORS 443.725 to 443.780 from adult foster homes licensed to serve
persons who  are elderly or have physical disabilities shall be deposited in the Quality Care Fund
established in ORS 443.001.
[(11)] (14) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or  ORS 443.725 or 443.738, the
licensing agency may issue a 60-day provisional license  to a qualified person if the agency deter-
mines that an emergency situation exists after being notified that the licensed  provider of an adult
foster home is no longer overseeing operation of the adult foster home.
SECTION 11.  ORS 443.755 is amended to read:
443.755. (1)(a) The licensing agency staff shall be permitted access to enter and  inspect all li-
censed adult foster homes.  The licensing agency shall visit and inspect every adult foster home
to determine whether  the home is maintained and operated in accordance with ORS 443.002
and 443.705 to 443.825 and the rules of  the licensing agency, and to consult with and advise
the provider concerning methods of care, treatment, training, records, housing and equip-
ment.
(b) The licensing agency shall conduct an on-site  inspection under this subsection at a
minimum:
(A) No less than  90 days and no more than 120 days after an initial license is issued under
ORS 443.735;
(B) Annually, regardless of whether the duration of  the adult foster home’s license has
been extended to two years under ORS 443.735 (9); and
(C) Upon receipt of a license renewal application under ORS 443.735.
(c) Inspections  under this subsection may be conducted at other times as determined by
the licensing agency.
(2) The licensing agency  shall be permitted access to enter and inspect any unlicensed adult
foster home upon the receipt of an oral or written  complaint, or in case the agency itself has cause
to believe that an adult foster home is operating  without a license or there exists a threat to the
health, safety or welfare  of any resident. The licensing agency staff shall be permitted access to the
residents of adult foster homes in order  to interview residents privately and to inspect residents’
records.
[(2)] (3) The state or local fire  inspectors shall be permitted access to enter and inspect adult
foster homes regarding fire safety upon request of the licensing agency.
[(3)(a)] (4)(a) The licensing agency shall provide to each licensed adult foster  home in the state
in writing in clear concise  language readily comprehensible by the average person a copy of the
inspection report of the most recent inspection of that home conducted by the agency.
(b) The provider shall post the  inspection report in the entry or equally prominent place and
shall, upon request, provide a copy of the information to each resident  of, or person applying for
admission to, the  home, or the legal representative, guardian or conservator of the resident or ap-
plicant.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 443.886 is amended to read:
443.886. (1) If a facility intends to provide care for residents with Alzheimer’s disease or other
forms of dementia by  means of an endorsed memory care community, the facility must obtain a
memory care endorsement on its license or registration.
(2) The Department of Human Services, with the input from representatives of  advocate groups
and the long term care industry, shall adopt by rule standards that ensure that the special  needs
of any resident with Alzheimer’s disease or other form of dementia who is cared for  in an endorsed
Enrolled Senate Bill 739 (SB 739-B) Page 8
memory care community are met and that quality care is provided. The standards must include  but
are not limited to provisions for:
(a) Care planning, [ including physical ] facility design, staffing, staff and administrator training,
safety, egress control, elopement notifications,  individual care planning,  admission and transfer
policy, family involvement, therapeutic activities and social services;
(b) Continuity of basic care requirements , including procedures to be  followed during emer-
gency evacuations and facility closures ; and
(c) Marketing and advertising of  the availability of and services from endorsed memory care
communities.
(3) The department shall adopt a  fee schedule for memory care endorsement, taking into account
the type of facility and the number of residents.
(4) The department shall enforce rules adopted  under subsection (2) of this section and ORS
443.889 and shall allow a licensee or registrant to retain the memory care endorsement required to
care for residents with Alzheimer’s disease  or other forms of dementia only as long as the licensee
or registrant complies with the rules.
(5) The memory care endorsement may be suspended or revoked in the same manner as the li-
cense or registration is suspended or revoked.
(6) Unless a facility has obtained the memory  care endorsement required by subsection (1) of
this section, the facility may not:
(a) Advertise the facility as providing an Alzheimer’s care unit or memory care community; or
(b) Market the facility as providing an Alzheimer’s care unit or memory care community.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 443.443 is amended to read:
443.443. (1) A residential care facility, which  includes an assisted living facility, shall provide,
at a minimum, the following information to an individual or any person acting on behalf of the in-
dividual at the time the individual  applies for admission to the residential care facility and upon
request:
(a) A summary explanation of the services provided by the facility;
(b) A summary explanation of the types of care that the facility does not provide;
(c) A statement that if the facility is not  capable of meeting the resident’s needs for care and
services, the facility may require the resident  to pursue other options, including by moving to an-
other facility or care setting;
(d) A statement that if a resident leaves the facility to receive acute  medical, psychiatric,
nursing facility or  other care, before the resident may return to the facility, the facility will first
evaluate whether the facility is capable of meeting the resident’s care needs and,  if not, the resident
will not be permitted to return to the facility;
(e) A  statement of a resident’s right to appeal if the facility requires the resident to leave the
facility or does not permit the resident to return to the facility, as  described in paragraphs (c) and
(d) of this subsection; [ and]
(f) A statement of whether  the facility will arrange for or otherwise coordinate hospice care for
a resident upon request ; and
(g) A summary explanation of the licensing and survey  process for residential care fa-
cilities, as described in subsection (4) of this section .
(2) The information described in subsection (1) of this section must:
(a) Be in writing;
(b) Be written in plain English;
(c) Be explained to the individual or  the person acting on behalf of the individual in a manner
the individual or person understands;
(d) Be provided separately from all other disclosure and residency agreement documents; and
(e) Require the signature  of the individual or the person acting on behalf of the individual ac-
knowledging that the  individual or person understands the content and the implications of the in-
formation.
Enrolled Senate Bill 739 (SB 739-B) Page 9
(3) A residential care  facility must update and submit to the Department of Human Services the
information described in this  section at any time there is a change in management or ownership of
the facility. The department shall make the information available to the public on  the department’s
facility search website.
(4) The department shall develop and  make available to residential care facilities a sum-
mary explanation of the licensing and survey process  for residential care facilities, including
information about where to find licensing and survey results for a facility.
SECTION 14.  ORS 443.420 is amended to read:
443.420. (1) As used in this  section, “substantial compliance” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 443.436.
(2) A person applying for a license  under ORS 443.415 must, in the judgment of the director of
the licensing agency, be a person:
(a) Who demonstrates an understanding and acceptance of the rules governing residential  facil-
ities;
(b) Mentally and physically capable of caring for such residents; and
(c) Who employs or utilizes only individuals  whose presence does not jeopardize the health,
safety or welfare of residents.
[(2)] (3) A residential facility may not be operated or maintained in combination  with a nursing
home or hospital unless:
(a) The residential facility is licensed, maintained and operated as a separate and  distinct part;
or
(b) The residential facility is licensed as a conversion facility under ORS 443.431.
[(3)] (4) All physical residential facilities used for residents must meet applicable requirements
of the State Fire Marshal.
[(4)] (5) As of  the date of licensure, a residential facility must be in substantial compliance with
applicable state and local laws, rules, codes, ordinances and permit requirements.
[(5)] (6) Prior to licensure, a  residential facility that proposes to house persons under the age
of 21 years shall submit written proof to the licensing agency demonstrating that the facility will:
(a) Comply with ORS 336.575; and
(b) Ensure that the children who reside  at the residential facility receive appropriate educa-
tional services that are:
(A) Comprehensive and age-appropriate;
(B) In compliance with requirements of state and federal law; and
(C) If applicable, in compliance with the individual education program of the child.
[(6)] (7) Prior to an initial licensure  of a residential care facility, the licensing agency shall
consider:
(a) The license applicant’s history of regulatory compliance and operational experience;
(b) The willingness of the license applicant to serve underserved populations; and
(c) The willingness of the license applicant to contract  with the licensing agency to provide
services through the state medical assistance program.
[(7)(a)] (8)(a) The licensing agency may not issue an initial license to a residential care  facility
if the facility has not conducted a market study that assesses the need for  the services offered by
the facility in the geographic area served by the facility.
(b) This subsection does not apply to a conversion facility licensed under ORS 443.431.
(9)(a) If an applicant for a license to operate a residential care facility does not  have
experience in the operation or management of a residential care facility in this state,  the
applicant shall, for a period of at least  six months of operation, contract for the services of
a consultant or management company with experience in the operation or management of a
residential care facility in this state.
(b) The Department of Human Services shall establish  by rule the minimum qualifica-
tions for  a consultant or management company under this subsection, including require-
ments that the consultant or management company:
Enrolled Senate Bill 739 (SB 739-B) Page 10
(A) Holds, or employs a person  who holds, an active residential care facility administra-
tor license issued under ORS 678.710 to 678.820 that is in good standing;
(B) Within  the last five years, has at least three years of demonstrated experience op-
erating or managing a residential care facility in this state in a satisfactory manner;
(C) Within the last five years, has at least three years of  demonstrated experience op-
erating or managing a  residential care facility with a memory care endorsement under ORS
443.886, if the consultant or  management company is consulting with a person applying for
a license to operate a residential care facility with a memory care endorsement under ORS
443.886; and
(D) Is not listed as an excluded provider on the comprehensive listing maintained by the
United States Department of Health and Human Services’ Office of Inspector General  of
providers that are excluded from participation in federal health care programs.
(c) The Department  of Human Services shall establish by rule the tasks that a contracted
consultant or management company under this subsection must complete, including, at  a
minimum:
(A) Review of the residential care facility’s policies and procedures;
(B) Review of the residential care facility’s quality improvement process;
(C) Periodic on-site compliance audits; and
(D) Preparation of monthly reports that the consultant or management company shall
submit to the department for review.
(d) The department may extend  the duration of the period of consultation beyond six
months if the department determines,  from an on-site visit, a review of the required monthly
reports or both, that the facility is not  in substantial compliance with applicable state or
federal laws, rules or regulations.
(e) If a contract for the services of a consultant or management  company under this
subsection is terminated early, the license applicant and  the consultant or management
company shall notify the department within two business days.
[(8)] (10) Prior  to the issuance of an initial license to a residential training facility or a resi-
dential training home, and upon an application for a renewal of  a license of a residential training
facility or a residential training home, the licensing agency shall consider the  license applicant’s
history of regulatory and safety compliance and operational experience in this state or  any other
jurisdiction as prescribed by rule by the licensing agency.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 443.436 is amended to read:
443.436. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Consistently” means regularly and typically.
(b) “Substantial compliance” means  a level of compliance with state law and with rules of the
Department of  Human Services such that any identified deficiencies pose a risk of no more than
negligible harm to the health or safety of residents.
(2)(a) The department shall develop a framework  for assessing the compliance of residential care
facilities with regulatory requirements and for requiring corrective action that accurately  and
equitably measures compliance and the extent of noncompliance.
(b) The framework must  include but is not limited to measures of the severity and scope of a
residential care facility’s noncompliance, including but not limited to:
(A) Whether the facility has qualified awake direct care  staff in sufficient numbers to consist-
ently meet the scheduled and unscheduled needs of each resident 24 hours a day; and
(B) The  impact of any compliance deficiencies on the rights, health, welfare and safety of the
residents.
(c) The department shall publish the framework on the department’s website  and shall distribute
the framework to residential care facilities licensed in this state.
(3) The department shall administer  a residential care facility enhanced oversight and super-
vision program that focuses  department resources on residential care facilities that consistently
demonstrate:
Enrolled Senate Bill 739 (SB 739-B) Page 11
(a) A lack of substantial compliance with the requirements  of ORS 443.400 to 443.455 or rules
adopted to implement ORS 443.400 to 443.455; or
(b) Performance substantially below  statewide averages on quality metrics reported under the
Residential Care Quality Measurement Program established under ORS 443.446.
(4) The residential care facility enhanced oversight and supervision program  shall take one or
more of the following actions  that the department deems necessary to improve the performance of
a residential care facility:
(a) Increase the frequency of surveys of the residential care facility.
(b) Conduct surveys that focus on areas of consistent noncompliance  identified by the depart-
ment.
(c) Impose one or more conditions on the license of the facility under ORS 441.736.
(5) The department shall terminate  the enhanced oversight and supervision of a residential care
facility:
(a) After three years if the residential care facility has shown through at  least two consecutive
in-person site surveys and reported quality metrics that the residential care facility no longer meets
the criteria set forth in subsection (3) of this section; or
(b) After one year  if the residential care facility submits a written assertion of substantial
compliance and the department determines  that the residential care facility no longer meets the
criteria set forth in subsection (3) of this section.
(6) The department shall publish notice on the  department’s website, including any website
where the public can access a  database of long term care facilities, of any residential care facility
that is in the enhanced oversight and supervision program.
(7) A residential care facility that is  in the enhanced oversight and supervision program
shall provide written  notice to current and prospective residents of the facility and any
contact persons designated by residents under ORS 443.444 that the  facility has been placed
in the program.  Once the department has terminated the enhanced oversight and super-
vision, the facility may notify residents that the facility is no longer in the program.
[(7)] (8)  Using moneys from the Quality Care  Fund established under ORS 443.001, the depart-
ment shall develop, maintain and periodically update compliance  guidelines for residential care fa-
cilities serving seniors and persons with disabilities. The guidelines  must be made available
electronically.
[(8)] (9)  This section does not preclude the department from taking any action authorized  by
ORS 443.400 to 443.455.
SECTION 16.
(1) The amendments to ORS 443.441  by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to
complaints submitted on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(2) Section 3 of this 2025 Act applies to requests  for exceptions made on or after the ef-
fective date of this 2025 Act.
(3) The amendments to ORS 443.415, 443.416, 443.420, 443.425, 443.735 and 443.755  by
sections 7 to 11 and 14 of this 2025 Act apply  to licenses issued or renewed on or after the
effective date of this 2025 Act.
(4) The amendments to ORS  443.886 by section 12 of this 2025 Act apply to memory care
endorsements issued on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(5) The amendments to  ORS 443.443 by section 13 of this 2025 Act apply to applications
for admission to a residential care facility  made on or after the effective date of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health  Authority by section 1 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (En-
rolled House Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for behavioral health, is  in-
creased by $301,014.
SECTION 18. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (2), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled  House Bill
5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
Enrolled Senate Bill 739 (SB 739-B) Page 12
from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2025 (Enrolled House Bill 5025), collected  or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for
behavioral health, is increased by $301,014.
SECTION 19.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of  Human Services by section 1 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5526), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for  aging and people with
disabilities programs, is increased by $2,606,369.
SECTION 20. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (6), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5526), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 5526), collected or  received by the Department of Human Services,
for aging and people with disabilities programs, is increased by $2,447,526.
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 739 (SB 739-B) Page 13